Tennessee, session 114, SB2157.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 7, is amended by adding the following
as a new chapter:
7-92-101. Definitions.
As used in this section:
(1) "Local government" means an incorporated city or town, county, or
metropolitan form of government; and
(2) "Tourism development zone" means a geographical area within the
jurisdiction of a local government that has been designated as a tourism
development zone by ordinance or resolution of the local government.
7-92-102. Tourism development zone access.
A local government:
(1) Shall not prohibit ingress or egress into a tourism development zone
by private or commercial vehicles or pedestrian traffic;
(2) Shall not block streets or other rights-of-ways within a tourism
development zone in a manner that disrupts the operation of businesses within
the tourism development zone; prohibits the delivery of goods, services,
merchandise, food, and beverages to businesses and patrons with the tourism
development zone; or prohibits taxis, public transportation vehicles, or ride
SB2157
010231
- 1 -

sharing companies from picking up or dropping off persons within the tourism
development zone; and
(3) May temporarily prohibit ingress or egress or block streets or other
rights-of-ways to or within a tourism development zone:
(A) For purposes of providing exclusive access to first responders
during an emergency; and
(B) For an event hosted by the local government pursuant to a
contract between the local government and the event operator or event
promoter.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 010231